Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 4. Annexation; Determination of Boundaries; Addition and Exclusionof Land

Cross references. —

As to power of cities and towns to establish and maintain zoological gardens within or without the corporate limits, see §

15-1-103

.

As to territories which may incorporate as towns, see §

15-1-201

.

As to agreements by cities and towns for extension of water systems, see §

15-7-601

.

As to extension of water systems beyond corporate limits of city, see §

15-7-602

.

For provisions that all maps, plats, plans or designs necessary to be filed in all city or town offices shall be made and certified by a professional engineer or land surveyor, see § 33-29-139.

As to platting and dedications generally, see §§

34-12-101

to

34-12-115

.

For duty of city or village annexing sanitary and improvement districts to assume and pay the bonds and other obligations outstanding at the time of annexation, see §

35-3-114

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 41 to 43, 51 to 96, 532 to 559.

Capacity to attack the fixing or extension of municipal limits or boundary, 13 ALR2d 1279.

Proper remedy or procedure for attacking legality of proceedings annexing territory to municipal corporation, 18 ALR2d 1255.

What land is contiguous or adjacent to municipality so as to be subject to annexation, 49 ALR3d 589.

Right of one governmental subdivision to challenge annexation proceedings by another such subdivision, 17 ALR5th 195.

Refusal of municipality to annex impoverished area as violative of federal law, 22 ALR Fed 272.

62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations § 44 et seq.

§ 15-1-401.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Business day” means any day other than Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday as established by the annexing municipality;

“Landowner” means the owner of real property in the territory proposed to be annexed who in the last calendar year was liable for a property tax thereon or was exempt by law from the payment of taxes on the property. Anyone having a right to purchase land under a written contract is the owner of that land for annexation purposes. For purposes of W.S.

15-1-402

,

15-1-404

and

15-1-405

“landowner” shall include persons owning property which, as a result of the proposed annexation would then be brought within one-half (1/2) mile of the corporate limits of a city which has exercised the authority granted under W.S. 15-3-202(b)(ii);

“Petition” means a legibly written document.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 54; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-54; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-501

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability for purposes of challenging annexation. —

Even though adjoining landowners were not included in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-1-409

by virtue of the definition of landowner under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 15-1-401(a)(ii), they still had standing to challenge the annexation of property pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-37-103

of the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act because they had an interest in the annexation, given that the annexation brought the landowners' property under the city's control, and the annexation facilitated the annexation of the landowners' property. Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 15-1-402.
Annexing territories; findings required; when contiguity not deemed affected; annexation report.

Before any territory is eligible for annexation, the governing body of any city or town at a hearing as provided in W.S.

15-1-405

shall find that:

An annexation of the area is for the protection of the health, safety and welfare of the persons residing in the area and in the city or town;

The urban development of the area sought to be annexed would constitute a natural, geographical, economical and social part of the annexing city or town;

The area sought to be annexed is a logical and feasible addition to the annexing city or town and the extension of basic and other services customarily available to residents of the city or town shall, within reason, be available to the area proposed to be annexed;

The area sought to be annexed is contiguous with or adjacent to the annexing city or town, or the area meets the requirements of W.S.

15-1-407

;

If the city or town does not own or operate its own electric utility, its governing body is prepared to issue one (1) or more franchises as necessary to serve the annexed area pursuant to W.S.

15-1-410

; and

The annexing city or town, not less than twenty (20) business days prior to the public hearing required by W.S.

15-1-405

(a), has sent by certified mail to all landowners and affected public utilities within the territory a summary of the proposed annexation report as required under subsection (c) of this section and notice of the time, date and location of the public hearing required by W.S. 15-1-405(a).

Contiguity will not be adversely affected by the existence of a platted street or alley, a public or private right-of-way, a public or private transportation right-of-way, a lake, stream, reservoir or other natural or artificial waterway located between the annexing city or town and the land sought to be annexed.

An annexing municipality shall prepare a proposed annexation report as specified in this subsection. The report shall, at a minimum, contain:

A map of the area proposed to be annexed showing identifiable landmarks and boundaries and the area which will, as a result of the annexation then be brought within one-half (1/2) mile of the new corporate limits of the city, if it has exercised the authority granted under W.S. 15-3-202(b)(ii);

The total estimated cost of infrastructure improvements required of all landowners by the annexing municipality related to the annexation;

A list of basic and other services customarily available to residents of the city or town and a timetable when those services will reasonably be available to the area proposed to be annexed;

A projected annual fee or service cost for services described in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

The current and projected property tax mill levies imposed by the municipality; and

The cost of infrastructure improvements required within the existing boundaries of the municipality to accommodate the proposed annexation.

For annexations initiated under W.S.

15-1-403

, the city or town may collect the cost of preparing the proposed annexation report from the petitioning landowners.

Before any territory is eligible for annexation the governing body shall prepare for each landowner and affected public utility so requesting in writing, the estimated cost of infrastructure improvements required of the landowner and affected public utility related to the annexation. The request shall be made to the clerk of the annexing municipality not less than ten (10) days prior to the public hearing required by W.S. 15-1-405(a). The estimate shall be provided to the landowner and affected public utility prior to the hearing.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 55; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-55; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-502

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1989, ch. 198, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2; 2001, ch. 68, § 1; 2003, ch. 65, § 1.

Standing. —

When neighbors of a parcel proposed for annexation to a city contested the validity of the city's ordinance approving the annexation under this section, the neighbors could only seek a declaratory judgment under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-37-103

, contesting the ordinance's validity, because the neighbors owned no land in the parcel proposed for annexation or the city. BJ Hough, LLC v. City of Cheyenne, 2012 WY 140, 287 P.3d 761,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2012).

Administrative procedures inapplicable. —

The determinations required by this section do not resolve legal rights, duties or privileges so as to make applicable the Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969).

State legislatures may alter or change corporate boundaries,

annexing or detaching territory as they will, with or without the consent of the inhabitants, subject only to constitutional limitations. Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969).

Constitutional rights ordinarily not invaded. —

The fixing of territorial boundaries of a municipal corporation will not ordinarily constitute an invasion of federal constitutional rights. Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969).

Mere act of annexation does not take away property from an owner

nor affect his private right. It may bring it into another jurisdiction, and affect the civil relation of the owner towards the public, but, as between individual and individual, his rights will remain equal with others under the same circumstances. Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969).

No one has a vested right to be either included or excluded

from a local governmental unit. Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969).

But municipal corporations are bound by restrictions placed upon them by legislature

in making annexations. Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969).

Prerequisites to adoption of annexation ordinance. —

Following the hearing, where necessary, in a proceeding initiated by petition or in a proceeding initiated by the city or town itself, §

15-1-406

provides that if the governing body finds that the conditions prescribed by this section exist and the required procedures met, an ordinance shall be adopted annexing the territory involved. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Boundaries of annexed area must be definitely fixed by a legal description.

In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Fulfillment of requirements. —

The requirements under subsection (a)(iii) that the “area sought to be annexed is a logical and feasible addition to the annexing … town and that the extension of basic services … can reasonably be furnished to the area proposed to be annexed” are fulfilled at least in part by a showing that certain services had been previously furnished and were feasible. Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969).

Only requirement with respect to scope and extent of area to be annexed

is that it must be contiguous to the annexing city or town. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Size and shape of the area to be annexed

is a political question. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Neither general law nor statute requires that an area proposed for annexation to a city or town be of any particular size or shape. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Courts are not concerned with wisdom or expediency of altering boundaries

of a city or town by annexation. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Determination of question of arbitrary or unreasonable action by city council

is largely factual and dependent upon the facts and circumstances presented in each proceeding, keeping in mind that each relevant factor is to be considered and weighed along with other relevant factors and with no single factor a legal absolute in the sense that it is conclusive. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Reasonableness of action taken by governing body is presumed,

and the burden is on the landowner attacking the ordinance on that basis clearly to show by substantial evidence that such action was unreasonable. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Where evidence of compliance found. —

Where there was substantial evidence of the council's compliance with the provisions of this article, particularly with this section and §

15-1-409

, the judgment of the trial court was adequately supported. Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969).

Applied

in

Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Town of Wheatland v. Allison, 577 P.2d 1006,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 15-1-403.
Annexing territories; initiation of proceedings; by landowners' petition; validity of signatures; determinations.

The proceedings for annexation of eligible territory may be initiated by a written petition filed with the clerk of the city or town to which annexation of the territory is proposed, after compliance with the following conditions and procedures:

The petition is signed and dated by a majority of the landowners owning a majority of the area sought to be annexed, excluding public streets and alleys and tax exempt property;

The petition contains the following detailed information:

A legal description of the area sought to be annexed;

A request that the described territory be annexed;

A statement that each signer is an owner of land and a description of his land within the area proposed to be annexed; and

A map of the area.

No signature on the petition is valid if it is dated more than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the date of filing the petition with the clerk. No person signing a petition for annexation may withdraw his signature from the petition after it has been filed with the clerk.

The clerk shall within ten (10) days from the date the petition is filed, determine if the petition substantially complies with this article.

If the petition complies, the clerk shall certify compliance, and the procedure outlined in W.S.

15-1-402

,

15-1-405

and

15-1-406

shall then be followed. If it does not comply the petitioner shall be notified that no further action will be taken on the petition until compliance is made.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 56; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-56; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-503

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2; 2003, ch. 65, § 1.

Statutes prescribe several methods of procedure for initiatingannexation proceedings. —

This section prescribes the procedure to be followed in a proceeding initiated by landowners of an area proposed to be annexed. Section

15-1-404

prescribes a procedure whereby the governing body of the city or town may of its own volition initiate the proceeding by resolution and proceed with a hearing upon the matter if minimum compliance as prescribed by §

15-1-402

is shown. A third method prescribed by §

15-1-407

, insofar as landowners are concerned, permits annexation without the necessity of a resolution or public hearing in the event the owner or owners of all of the area sought to be annexed petition the city or town to annex such area. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Section

15-1-407

provides for an annexation method that does not require identifying “landowners” or applying the petition compliance procedures found in this section, but forgoes those procedures and chooses instead to solely rely upon the requirement that the ordinance provide a statement that all owners of the territory have signed a petition requesting annexation; an annexation ordinance that fails to comply with this requirement would be subject to district court review and could be declared void under § 15-1-409(b). Kroenlein v. Eddington, 2001 WY 115, 35 P.3d 1207,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2001).

Description in petition should be sufficient to ascertain territory

sought to be annexed. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

Map defining area sufficient. —

Where the petition does not contain a proper “legal” description of the entire area, but a map defining the area to be annexed, which is attached to the petition, this is sufficient. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

Sufficiency of signatures must be tested when petition is signed and filed

with the appropriate official and not at some other and later time. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

Compliance with dating requirement. —

Where each page of petition is dated and there is no showing that the dates are either incorrect or the method of dating faulty, the dating requirement has been complied with. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

Jurisdiction vests in the town when the petition is filed,

and neither the town's deletion of land nor the constructive withdrawal of the petitioners' names can affect the integrity of the petition for purposes of determining the town's jurisdiction to act thereon. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

Prerequisites to adoption of annexation ordinance. —

Following the hearing, where necessary, in a proceeding initiated by petition or in a proceeding initiated by the city or town itself, §

15-1-406

provides that if the governing body finds that the conditions prescribed by §

15-1-402

exist and the required procedures met, an ordinance shall be adopted annexing the territory involved. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Standard of review on appeal. —

Before the supreme court can declare the ordinance of annexation void, it has to find the landowners' petition to be so irregular and defective that, pitted against a standard of minimum compliance, the town council's exercise of its discretion amounted to arbitrary and capricious action. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

Word “minimum,”

for purposes of deciding whether the landowner's petition meets the statutory mandate of minimum compliance, is defined as the least quantity assignable, admissible or possible in a given case — opposed to “maximum.” Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 15-1-404.
Annexing territories; initiation of proceedings; by governing bodies; determination.

The governing body of any city or town may initiate proceedings to annex territory by the following procedure:

Reasonable evidence shall be procured by the governing body indicating that a specific area meets the conditions and limitations of W.S.

15-1-402

;

The governing body shall:

Cause to be prepared a legal description, a listing of the current mailing address of each landowner as shown in the records of the county assessor and a map showing identifiable landmarks and boundaries of the area considered for annexation and the area which will, as a result of the annexation then be brought within one-half (1/2) mile of the new corporate limits of the city, if it has exercised the authority granted under W.S. 15-3-202(b)(ii);

Determine if the area considered for annexation complies with W.S.

15-1-402

;

Prepare a proposed annexation report as required by W.S. 15-1-402(c);

Prepare for each landowner or public utility so requesting in writing, the foreseeable changes to zoning, animal control and other health and safety requirements requiring immediate compliance by the landowner or public utility at the time of annexation. The request shall be made to the clerk of the annexing municipality not less than ten (10) days prior to the public hearing required under W.S. 15-1-405(a). The foreseeable changes shall be provided to the landowner or public utility prior to the hearing.

If the area complies with W.S.

15-1-402

, the governing body shall adopt a resolution certifying compliance, and the procedure outlined in W.S.

15-1-405

and

15-1-406

shall then be followed. If the area does not comply, no further action shall be taken on the proposed annexation.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 57; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-57; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-504

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1995, ch. 196, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, §§ 2, 4.

Statutes prescribe several methods of procedure for initiatingannexation proceedings. —

Section

15-1-403

prescribes the procedure to be followed in a proceeding initiated by landowners of an area proposed to be annexed. This section prescribes a procedure whereby the governing body of the city or town may of its own volition initiate the proceeding by resolution and proceed with a hearing upon the matter if minimum compliance as prescribed by §

15-1-402

is shown. A third method prescribed by §

15-1-407

, insofar as landowners are concerned, permits annexation without the necessity of a resolution or public hearing in the event the owner or owners of all of the area sought to be annexed petition the city or town to annex such area. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Prerequisites to adoption of annexation ordinance. —

Following the hearing, where necessary, in a proceeding initiated by petition or in a proceeding initiated by the city or town itself, §

15-1-406

provides that if the governing body finds that the conditions prescribed by §

15-1-402

exist and the required procedures met, an ordinance shall be adopted annexing the territory involved. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Applied

in

Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Town of Marbleton v. Town of Big Piney, 719 P.2d 1389,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 15-1-405.
Annexing territories; public hearing required; notice thereof.

In any annexation proceeding the governing body shall establish a date, time and place for a public hearing to determine if the proposed annexation complies with W.S.

15-1-402

. The hearing shall be held not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one hundred eighty (180) days after the petition has been certified to be complete.

The clerk shall give notice of the public hearing by publishing a notice at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the territory sought to be annexed. The first notice shall be given at least fifteen (15) business days prior to the date of the public hearing. The notice shall contain a location map which includes identifiable landmarks and boundaries of the area sought to be annexed and the area which will, as a result of the annexation then be brought within one-half (1/2) mile of the new corporate limits of the city, if it has exercised the authority granted under W.S. 15-3-202(b)(ii). The notice shall include a summary of the proposed annexation report prepared pursuant to W.S. 15-1-402(c). Upon written request to the clerk of the annexing municipality, the clerk shall provide a legal description of the area and the names of the persons owning property within the area.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 58; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-58; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-505

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2; 2001, ch. 68, § 1; 2003, ch. 65, § 1.

Prerequisites to adoption of annexation ordinance. —

Following the hearing, where necessary, in a proceeding initiated by petition or in a proceeding initiated by the city or town itself, §

15-1-406

provides that if the governing body finds that the conditions prescribed by §

15-1-402

exist and the required procedures met, an ordinance shall be adopted annexing the territory involved. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Standard of review on appeal. —

Before the supreme court can declare the ordinance of annexation void, it has to find the landowners' petition to be so irregular and defective that, pitted against a standard of minimum compliance, the town council's exercise of its discretion amounted to arbitrary and capricious action. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

Applied

in

Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 15-1-406.
Annexing territories; annexation ordinance; objections; exception; prohibition.

If after the hearing the governing body finds that the conditions required by W.S.

15-1-402

exist and that the required procedures have been met, it shall by ordinance annex the territory. Upon completion of annexation procedures, the clerk of the annexing municipality shall file with the county clerk a map of the area to be annexed and a copy of the ordinance approved by the governing body of the annexing municipality.

If more than fifty percent (50%) of the landowners, or if a landowner or landowners owning more than fifty percent (50%) of the area to be annexed file written objections with the clerk of the annexing municipality within twenty (20) business days after the hearing under W.S. 15-1-405(a) no further action under W.S.

15-1-404

may be taken on any area within the proposed annexation within two (2) years.

If seventy-five percent (75%) or more of the perimeter of the area to be annexed is contiguous to the corporate limits of the annexing city or town, the provisions of subsection (b) of this section do not apply.

No annexation under W.S.

15-1-404

shall create an area which is situated entirely within the boundaries of the city or town but is not annexed.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 59; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-59; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-506

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1993, ch. 14, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2.

Standard of review on appeal. —

Before the supreme court can declare the ordinance of annexation void, it has to find the landowners' petition to be so irregular and defective that, pitted against a standard of minimum compliance, the town council's exercise of its discretion amounted to arbitrary and capricious action. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 15-1-407.
Annexing territories; when notice and public hearing not necessary; statement required.

If the city is the sole owner of any territory whether or not contiguous that it desires to annex, the governing body, by ordinance, may annex the territory to the city or town without notice or public hearing as provided in W.S.

15-1-405

and without preparing the annexation report or providing the estimates required by W.S. 15-1-402(c) and (e) and 15-1-404(a)(ii)(C) and (D). All ordinances annexing territory without notice and public hearing shall contain a statement that the territory is solely owned by the petitioning city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 60; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-60; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-507

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2; 2001, ch. 68, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to vacation of parks, playgrounds and recreational areas and subsequent disposal of such property in cities and towns generally, see §§

15-7-301

to

15-7-305

.

For authority of cities and towns to borrow money or issue bonds for, among other purposes, acquiring recreational facilities, see §

15-7-103

.

As to acquisition and operation of recreational systems by municipalities and other legal subdivisions, see §§

18-9-201

,

18-9-202

.

Statutes prescribe several methods of procedure for initiatingannexation proceedings. —

Section

15-1-403

prescribes the procedure to be followed in a proceeding initiated by landowners of an area proposed to be annexed. Section

15-1-404

prescribes a procedure whereby the governing body of the city or town may of its own volition initiate the proceeding by resolution and proceed with a hearing upon the matter if minimum compliance as prescribed by §

15-1-402

is shown. A third method prescribed by this section prior to the 2001 amendment permits annexation without the necessity of a resolution or public hearing in the event the owner or owners of all of the area sought to be annexed petition the city or town to annex such area. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-1-407

provides for an annexation method that does not require identifying “landowners” or applying the petition compliance procedures found in §

15-1-403

, but foregoes those procedures and chooses instead to solely rely upon the requirement that the ordinance provide a statement that all owners of the territory have signed a petition requesting annexation; an annexation ordinance that fails to comply with this requirement would be subject to district court review and could be declared void under § 15-1-409(b). Kroenlein v. Eddington, 2001 WY 115, 35 P.3d 1207,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 15-1-408.
Annexing territories; effective dates.

The annexation of any territory is effective upon publication of the ordinance, unless another date is specified in the ordinance. The effective date of the annexation ordinance shall not be less than twenty (20) business days after the public hearing required by W.S. 15-1-405(a). For purposes of real and personal property taxation, the annexation is not effective until January 1 next following the effective date of the ordinance. If an appeal is filed and perfected by a person other than a utility, the effective date is January 1 next following the court’s final decision of the matter. If an appeal of the franchise decision is filed and perfected by a utility, the annexation is effective upon the publication of the ordinance unless another date is specified in the ordinance, but the appealing utility shall be permitted to continue its present service in the annexed area until the court’s final decision of the matter.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 61; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-61; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-508

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2.

§ 15-1-409.
Annexing territories; appeal; determination; time for review; exclusiveness of appeal remedy.

If any landowner in the territory proposed to be annexed or any owner of real property in the annexing city or town, or utility is aggrieved by the acts of the governing body, he may appeal to the district court for a review of the acts or findings thereof.

If the court determines that the action taken was capricious or arbitrary, or if it appears from the evidence that the landowner’s right in his property is being unwarrantedly invaded or that the governing body abused its discretion, the court shall declare the annexing ordinance void. If the court determines the action of the governing body was proper and valid, it shall sustain the ordinance.

All proceedings to review the findings and the decisions of the governing body or actions to determine the validity of the annexation ordinance pursuant to the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act shall be brought within sixty (60) days of the effective date of the annexation ordinance, and if not brought within that time are forever barred.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 62; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-62; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-509

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1997, ch. 158, § 2; 2004, ch. 59, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective June 1, 2004, in (c), inserted “or actions to determine the validity of the annexation ordinance pursuant to the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act” after “the decisions of the governing body,” and substituted “sixty (60) days” for “ten (10) days.”

Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act. —

See title 1, ch. 37.

Prospective operation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 59, § 2, provides: “This act shall not affect any litigation pending in a court in this state prior to June 1, 2004.”

Section expresses general rule recognized by courts. —

This section grants the right of appeal to the district court by an aggrieved landowner directly affected by an annexation proceeding and, among other things, charging that the action of the governing body of a city or town was arbitrary, capricious or an abuse of discretion. This section expresses the rule generally recognized by the courts. In re West Laramie, 457 P.2d 498,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1969).

Statutes prescribe several methods of procedure for initiating annexation proceedings. —

Section

15-1-407

, provides for an annexation method that does not require identifying “landowners” or applying the petition compliance procedures found in
§

15-1-403

; it foregoes those procedures and chooses instead to solely rely upon the requirement that the ordinance provide a statement that all owners of the territory have signed a petition requesting annexation but an annexation ordinance that fails to comply with this requirement would be subject to district court review and could be declared void under subsection (b) of this section.
Kroenlein v. Eddington, 2001 WY 115, 35 P.3d 1207,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2001).

Non-annexing town, not owning property to be annexed, lacks standing. —

Town lacked standing, either express or implied, to challenge an annexation, where it was neither an owner of the property to be annexed nor a landowner in the annexing town. Town of Marbleton v. Town of Big Piney, 719 P.2d 1389,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1986).

Standard of review on appeal to supreme court. —

Before the supreme court can declare the ordinance of annexation void, it has to find the landowners' petition to be so irregular and defective that, pitted against a standard of minimum compliance, the town council's exercise of its discretion amounted to arbitrary and capricious action. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

Standing of resident property owners. —

Subsection (a) provides standing to resident property owners if they are aggrieved by the acts of the governing body because of a failure to comply with the annexation statutes. Kroenlein v. Eddington, 2001 WY 115, 35 P.3d 1207,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2001).

Standing of adjoining landowners. —

Even though adjoining landowners were not included in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-1-409

by virtue of the definition of landowner under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 15-1-401(a)(ii), they still had standing to challenge the annexation of property pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-37-103

of the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act because they had an interest in the annexation, given that the annexation brought the landowners' property under the city's control, and the annexation facilitated the annexation of the landowners' property. Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Landowner defined. —

The definition of landowner provided in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 15-1-401(a)(ii) includes in some instances those whose land after the annexation would be within 1/2 mile of the city limits and expressly states that the expanded definition of landowner applies for the purposes of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

15-1-402

,

15-1-404

,

15-1-405

. The expanded definition including those within 1/2 mile of the city limits after annexation does not apply to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-1-409

.Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Statute of limitations. —

The 10-day (now 60-day) statute of limitations in this section applies to those landowners granted specific notice and a right of review; it does not apply to adjoining landowners who bring a declaratory action to challenge the validity of an annexation ordinance. Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Judicial review. —

The judicial review role in an annexation proceeding is limited to determining whether, in exercising discretion, the governing body has acted capriciously or arbitrarily, the landowner's right in his property has been unwarrantedly invaded, or that the governing body has abused its discretion; a review of whether the governing body has acted arbitrarily or capriciously would necessarily include reviewing whether the governing body's action was illegal, fraudulent, or a clear abuse of authority. Kroenlein v. Eddington, 2001 WY 115, 35 P.3d 1207,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2001).

Where evidence of compliance found. —

Where there was substantial evidence of the council's compliance with the provisions of this article, particularly with §

15-1-402

and this section, the judgment of the trial court was adequately supported. Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969).